Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2914
Association; business; how conducted.

The business of the association shall be conducted so as to preclude any distribution of income, profit, or property of the association to members thereof except in payment of claims, in reduction of premiums, for experience refunds to members, or upon final dissolution.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 14.